nlp/Scripts/tsearch_data_polish/polish.affix
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁO
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLIŚMY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁYŚMY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLIŚCIE
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁYŚCIE
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLI
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁBYM
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁABYM
#	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁOBYM	#nie-ort
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁBYŚ
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁABYŚ
#	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁOBYŚ	#nie-ort
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁBY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁABY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁOBY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLIBY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁYBY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLIBYŚCIE
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁYBYŚCIE
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARLIBYŚMY
	[^Ą] [DMPW] R Z E Ć		>	-RZEĆ,ARŁYBYŚMY

	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁEM	#bóść
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁAM
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁEŚ
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁAŚ
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ŚĆ,DŁ
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁA
#	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁOM	#nie-ort
#	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁOŚ	#nie-ort
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁO
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLIŚMY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁYŚMY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLIŚCIE
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁYŚCIE
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLI
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ŚĆ,DŁBYM
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁABYM
#	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁOBYM	#nie-ort
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ŚĆ,DŁBYŚ
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁABYŚ
#	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁOBYŚ	#nie-ort
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ŚĆ,DŁBY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁABY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁOBY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLIBY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁYBY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLIBYŚCIE
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁYBYŚCIE
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODLIBYŚMY
	Ó Ś Ć		>	-ÓŚĆ,ODŁYBYŚMY
